Hawaii statutes.
§560:3-913 Distributions to trustee.
(a) Before distributing to a trustee, the personal representative may require
that the trust be registered if the State in which it is to be administered
provides for registration and that the trustee inform the beneficiaries as
provided in section 560:7-303.

(b) If the trust instrument does not excuse
the trustee from giving bond, the personal representative may petition the
appropriate court to require that the trustee post bond if the personal
representative apprehends that distribution might jeopardize the interests of
persons who are not able to protect themselves, and the personal representative
may withhold distribution until the court has acted.

(c) No inference of negligence on the part of
the personal representative shall be drawn from the personal representative's
failure to exercise the authority conferred by subsections (a) and (b). [L
1996, c 288, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next